Illinois, session 104th, HB2828.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Revenue Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 62505-820 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2505/2505-820 new)8    Sec. 2505-820. Property tax reimbursement; veterans.9    (a) As used in this Section: 10    "Base amount" means the total amount of exemptions granted 11for the 2024 levy year under Sections 15-165, 15-167, and 1215-169 of the Property Tax Code for property that is located in 13an eligible school district in the 2024 levy year. 14    "Current taxable year" means the taxable year for which 15property taxes are collected in the calendar year in which the 16report under subsection (b) is made. 17    "Current taxable year exemption amount" means the total 18amount of exemptions granted for the current taxable year 19under Sections 15-165, 15-167, and 15-169 of the Property Tax 20Code for property that is located in an eligible school 21district. 22    "Eligible school district" means a school district that, 23in the levy year for which the report under subsection (b) is   HB2828- 2 -LRB104 03412 HLH 13434 b1made, contains residential property that is located within 45 2miles of a United States military base. 3    (b) By March 1, 2026, and by March 1 of each calendar year 4thereafter, each eligible school district shall report to the 5Department of Revenue (i) the base amount for that school 6district and (ii) the current taxable year exemption amount 7for that school district. 8    (c) By April 1 of each year, the Department of Revenue 9shall certify to the State Comptroller and the State Treasurer 10the difference, if any, between the current taxable year 11exemption amount for each eligible school district and the 12base amount for that school district. Upon receipt of the 13certification, the Comptroller shall order transferred and the 14Treasurer shall transfer the certified amount from the General 15Revenue Fund to the Support our Veterans and Neighbors Fund. 16    (d) The Support our Veterans and Neighbors Fund is hereby 17created as a special fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the 18Fund shall be used by the Department of Veterans' Affairs to 19make grants to eligible school districts. The amount of the 20grant shall be the amount certified under subsection (c) for 21that school district.  22    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 23Section 5.1030 as follows: 24    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)  HB2828- 3 -LRB104 03412 HLH 13434 b1    Sec. 5.1030. The Support our Veterans and Neighbors Fund.